Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB337.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 section to read:Section 2422. Menstrual Hygiene Products in State Buildings.--(a) Except as provided under subsections (b) and (e), the Department of General Services shall make menstrual hygiene products available and install and maintain a dispensing machine and disposal receptacles for menstrual hygiene products in at least fifty per centum (50%) of bathrooms in all State buildings.(b) The Department of General Services shall not be required to install and maintain new disposal receptacles for menstrual hygiene products under subsection (a) in a bathroom in a State building if disposal receptacles for menstrual hygiene products are in suitable conditions and already located in the bathroom before or on the effective date of this subsection.(c) The Department of General Services shall make menstrual hygiene products under subsection (a) available to the general public and free of charge.(d) The Department of General Services shall develop and post signage to make the general public aware that menstrual products are available free of charge in at least fifty per centum (50%) of bathrooms in all State buildings.(e) The requirement under subsection (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A State building that does not contain a bathroom.(2) A State building that is not regularly occupied or in use, including any of the following:(i) A salt storage facility.(ii) An unoccupied storage building.(iii) A maintenance shed.(iv) A temporary structure.20250HB0337PN0292 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) The Department of General Services may adopt guidelines as necessary to implement this section.(g) As used in this section: "Menstrual hygiene product" means a tampon, sanitary napkin or pad."State building" means a building owned by the Commonwealth and maintained by the Department of General Services.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0337PN0292 - 3 - 12345678